Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2176
Trial; costs.

Issues may thereupon be joined and tried between any of the contesting parties, the question of costs on such issues being regulated between the contestants agreeably to the principles applicable to other cases.

R.S.1867, Code § 808, p. 538;

R.S.1913, § 8291;

C.S.1922, § 9244;

C.S.1929, § 20-2176;

R.S.1943, § 25-2176.

Issues may be joined and trial had between any of contesting parties to the suit. Fairley v. Kemper, 174 Neb. 565, 118 N.W.2d 754 (1962).